test/src/morphology/V-pollw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - pȯļļõ: # Verb 40 'eng /est sumbata/fin' - full paradigm
     pȯļļõ+V+Inf: pȯļļõ
     pȯļļõ+V+Ger: pȯļļõs
     pȯļļõ+V+Sup: pȯļļõm
     pȯļļõ+V+Sup+Ine: pȯļļõmõs
     pȯļļõ+V+Sup+Ela: pȯļļõmõst
     pȯļļõ+V+Sup+Tra: pȯļļõmõks
     pȯļļõ+V+Sup+Abe: pȯļļõmõt
     pȯļļõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pūoļõb
     pȯļļõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: pȯļļõt
     pȯļļõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: pȯļļõbõd
     pȯļļõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: pūoļiz
     pȯļļõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [pūoļizt, pūoļiztõ]
     pȯļļõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [pūoļizt, pūoļiztõ]
     pȯļļõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: pȯļ
     pȯļļõ+V+Cond+Sg3: pȯļļõks
     pȯļļõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: pȯļ
     pȯļļõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: pȯļ
     pȯļļõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: pȯļļõgid
     pȯļļõ+V+Jus+Sg3: pȯļļõg
     pȯļļõ+V+Quo+Sg3: pȯļļiji
     pȯļļõ+V+ActPrfPrc: pȯļļõn
     pȯļļõ+V+PssPrfPrc: pȯļdõd
